District of Columbia statutes.
9-1109.03

Appointment of District representatives.

The Mayor shall appoint all members to the joint state oversight agency who represent the District of Columbia. Those members shall serve at the pleasure of the Mayor.

Sept. 23, 1997, D.C. Law 12-20, § 4, 44 DCR 4023
1981 Ed., § 1-2445.3.